Maryland, session 2025, SB0774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
8–109.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE
Department shall annually value the operating unit of a public utility on the basis of the
value of the operating property of the public utility, by considering:
(1) the earning capacity of the operating unit; and
(2) all other factors relevant to a determination of value of the operating
unit.
– 1 –

Ch. 208 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The Department shall allocate to this State the value of that part of the
operating unit that is reasonably attributable to the part located in this State.
(c) (1) From the value allocated to this State under subsection (b) of this
section, the Department shall deduct:
(i) the fair average value of fuel that represents the percentage
reduction or exemption authorized by §§ 7–108, 7–222, and 7–226 of this article; and
(ii) the assessment of operating property, if any, that is exempt by
law from property tax.
(2) (i) The value remaining after making the deductions shall be
divided into an operating real property value and an operating personal property value, as
determined by the Department.
(ii) The value of operating real property is the assessment of
operating real property of a public utility.
(iii) The value of operating personal property is the assessment of
operating personal property of a public utility.
(3) Operating land of a public utility is valued and assessed by the
Department as part of the operating unit and is not valued and assessed by the supervisor.
(4) The provisions of this subsection are not intended to alter the law as
codified in former Article 81 of the Code that was in effect as of January 31, 1986.
(5) Returns, notices, and appeals of operating property assessments shall
be administered pursuant to the sections of this article governing personal property
assessments.
(d) For operating property of a public utility, the Department shall apportion the
assessment of that operating property among the counties and municipal corporations
where the operating property is located.
(e) (1) In determining whether to classify a company as a public utility, the
Department shall consider and evaluate whether the company:
(i) is subject to the authority of a regulatory body of the State or the
federal government, such as the Maryland Public Service Commission, the Federal
Communications Commission, or the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(ii) uses a significant portion of the real and personal property used
in its business operations as an integrated whole or unit;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 208
(iii) provides a basic service to the public; and
(iv) owns or uses assets that are most appropriately appraised using
the unit valuation method.
(2) Notwithstanding a company’s failure to meet all of the criteria under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Department may classify the company as a public
utility if the Department determines that the company predominantly meets the criteria.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IN
DETERMINING THE VALUE OF OPERATING PROPERTY OF A PROVIDER OF RURAL
BROADBAND SERVICE, THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) WHEN USING AN INCOME APPROACH, SHALL CONSIDER
ONLY ACTUAL OPERATING INCOME; AND
(II) WHEN USING A REPLACEMENT COST APPROACH, SHALL
OFFSET THE VALUATION OF PROPERTY TO THE EXTENT OF ANY CONTRIBUTIONS,
TAX CREDITS, OR OTHER SUBSIDIES AND BENEFITS PROVIDED BY A GOVERNMENTAL
UNIT OR PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE THE REPLACEMENT COST APPROACH
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF THE VALUE DETERMINED
IS LESS THAN THE VALUE DETERMINED USING THE INCOME APPROACH UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(f)] (G) The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of
this section.
7–522.
(A) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT
WITH A BROADBAND SERVICES PROVIDER LOCATED IN THE COUNTY FOR A
NEGOTIATED PAYMENT BY THE PROVIDER IN LIEU OF TAXES ON PROPERTY
LOCATED IN THE COUNTY AND OWNED BY THE PROVIDER.
(B) AN AGREEMENT FOR A NEGOTIATED PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE THAT, FOR THE TERM SPECIFIED IN THE
AGREEMENT:
(1) THE PROVIDER SHALL PAY TO THE COUNTY A SPECIFIED AMOUNT
EACH YEAR IN LIEU OF THE PAYMENT OF COUNTY REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY
TAX; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 208 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) ALL OR A SPECIFIED PART OF THE PROVIDER’S REAL AND
PERSONAL PROPERTY LOCATED IN THE COUNTY SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM COUNTY
PROPERTY TAX FOR THE TERM OF THE AGREEMENT.
(C) AS SPECIFIED IN AN AGREEMENT FOR A NEGOTIATED PAYMENT IN LIEU
OF TAXES UNDER THIS SECTION, FOR THE TERM SPECIFIED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE
PROVIDER’S REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY LOCATED IN THE COUNTY IS EXEMPT
FROM COUNTY PROPERTY TAX.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –